Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,127
Board of Pardons; duties.

The Board of Pardons shall:

(1) Exercise the pardon authority as defined in section 83-170 for all criminal offenses except treason and cases of impeachment;

(2) Make rules and regulations for its own administration and operation;

(3) Appoint and remove its employees as prescribed by the State Personnel System and delegate appropriate powers and duties to them;

(4) Consult with the Board of Parole concerning applications for the exercise of pardon authority;

(5) Consult with the Department of Motor Vehicles concerning applications received from the department pursuant to section 60-6,209 for the exercise of pardon authority; and

(6) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in carrying out its responsibilities under the provisions of the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 58, p. 3102;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 66;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 44;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 25.

State Personnel System, see section 81-1301 et seq.